Hawaii statutes.
[§147-124] Certification; requests
necessary. The department may designate any employee or agent of the
department to conduct the inspections and certification authorized under this
part at the request of persons having a financial interest in the seed. These
inspections and certification may be requested, but in no case shall be
required by the department. [L 2003, c 49, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next